Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1,105
Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund; authorized; use; records; investment.

The Tax Commissioner may apply to the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts to establish and maintain a Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund. The funds used to initiate and maintain the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund shall be drawn solely from the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund. The Tax Commissioner shall determine the amount of money to be held in the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund, consistent with carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the Charitable Gaming Division of the Department of Revenue but not to exceed five thousand dollars for the entire division. This restriction shall not apply to funds otherwise appropriated to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund for investigative purposes. When the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts have approved the establishment of the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund, a voucher shall be submitted to the Department of Administrative Services accompanied by such information as the department may require for the establishment of the fund. The Director of Administrative Services shall issue a warrant for the amount specified and deliver it to the Charitable Gaming Division. The fund may be replenished as necessary, but the total amount in the fund shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in any fiscal year. The fund shall be audited by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

Any prize amounts won, less any charitable gaming investigative expenditures, by Charitable Gaming Division personnel with funds drawn from the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund or reimbursed from the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund shall be deposited into the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund.

For the purpose of establishing and maintaining legislative oversight and accountability, the Department of Revenue shall maintain records of all expenditures, disbursements, and transfers of cash from the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund.

By September 15 of each year, the department shall report to the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the unexpended balance existing on June 30 of the previous fiscal year relating to investigative expenses in the Charitable Gaming Investigation Petty Cash Fund and any funds existing on June 30 of the previous fiscal year in the possession of Charitable Gaming Division personnel involved in investigations. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1989, LB 815, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 9.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.